Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1561YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 732 Section 1. Section 904.508, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Pursuant to section 904.702 , the director shall 3 establish and maintain an inmate savings fund in an 4 interest-bearing account for the deposit of all or part of an 5 inmateâs allowances wages and amounts, except amounts directed 6 to be deposited in the inmate telephone fund established in 7 section 904.508A , sent to the inmate from a source other than 8 the department. All or part of an inmateâs allowances wages 9 and amounts, except amounts directed to be deposited in the 10 inmate telephone fund established in section 904.508A , from 11 a source other than the department shall be deposited into 12 the savings fund, until the inmateâs deposit is equal to one 13 hundred dollars as provided in section 906.9 . If an inmateâs 14 deposits are equal to or in excess of one hundred dollars, the 15 inmate may voluntarily withdraw from the savings fund. The 16 director shall notify the inmate of this right to withdraw 17 and shall provide the inmate with a written request form 18 to facilitate the withdrawal. If the inmate withdraws and 19 the inmateâs deposits exceed the amount due as provided in 20 section 906.9 , the director shall disburse the excess amount 21 as provided for allowances wages under section 904.702 , except 22 the director shall not deposit the excess amount in the inmate 23 savings fund. If the inmate chooses to continue to participate 24 in the savings fund, the inmateâs deposits shall be returned 25 to the inmate upon discharge, parole, or placement on work 26 release. Otherwise, the inmateâs deposits shall be disposed 27 of as provided in subsection 3 . An inmateâs deposits into 28 the savings fund may be used to provide the money due the 29 inmate upon discharge, parole, or placement on work release, as 30 required under section 906.9 . Interest earned from the savings 31 fund shall be placed in a separate account, and may be used for 32 purchases approved by the director to directly and collectively 33 benefit inmates. 34 Sec. 2. Section 904.701, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 35 -1- LSB 1561YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 6 H.F. 732 to read as follows: 1 2. The director may when practicable shall pay the 2 inmate an allowance as the director deems proper in view of 3 the circumstances, and in view of the cost attending the 4 maintenance of the inmate. The allowance is a gratuitous 5 payment and is not a wage arising out of an employment 6 relationship. The payment shall not exceed the amount paid to 7 free labor for a like or equivalent service hourly wage, which 8 shall not be less than the minimum wage established in section 9 91D.1, subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . 10 Sec. 3. Section 904.702, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. If allowances are paid pursuant to section 904.701 , the 13 The director shall establish an inmate account , for deposit of 14 those allowances inmate wages paid pursuant to section 904.701 15 and for deposit of moneys sent to the inmate from a source 16 other than the department of corrections. The director may 17 deduct an amount, not to exceed ten percent of the amount of 18 the allowance wage , unless the inmate requests a larger amount, 19 to be deposited into the inmate savings fund as required under 20 section 904.508, subsection 2 . In addition to deducting a 21 portion of the allowance wage , the director may also deduct 22 from an inmate account any amount, except amounts directed 23 to be deposited in the inmate telephone fund established in 24 section 904.508A , sent to the inmate from a source other than 25 the department of corrections for deposit in the inmate savings 26 fund as required under section 904.508, subsection 2 , until 27 the amount in the fund equals the amount due the inmate upon 28 discharge, parole, or placement on work release. The director 29 shall deduct from the inmate account an amount the inmate is 30 legally obligated to pay for child support. The director 31 shall deduct from the inmate account an amount established 32 by the inmateâs restitution plan of payment. The director 33 shall also deduct from any remaining account balance an amount 34 sufficient to pay all or part of any judgment against the 35 -2- LSB 1561YH (2) 91 as/js 2/ 6 H.F. 732 inmate, including but not limited to judgments for taxes and 1 child support, and court costs and fees assessed either as a 2 result of the inmateâs confinement or amounts required to be 3 paid under section 610A.1 . Written notice of the amount of 4 the deduction shall be given to the inmate, who shall have 5 five days after receipt of the notice to submit in writing any 6 and all objections to the deduction to the director, who shall 7 consider the objections prior to transmitting the deducted 8 amount to the clerk of the district court. The director need 9 give only one notice for each action or appeal under section 10 610A.1 for which periodic deductions are to be made. The 11 director shall next deduct from any remaining account balance 12 an amount sufficient to pay all or part of any costs assessed 13 against the inmate for misconduct or damage to the property of 14 others. The director may deduct from the inmateâs account an 15 amount sufficient to pay for the inmateâs share of the costs of 16 health services requested by the inmate and for the treatment 17 of injuries inflicted by the inmate on the inmate or others. 18 The director may deduct and disburse an amount sufficient 19 for industriesâ programs to qualify under the eligibility 20 requirements established in the Justice Assistance Act of 1984, 21 Pub. L. No. 98-473, including an amount to pay all or part 22 of the cost of the inmateâs incarceration. The director may 23 pay all or any part of remaining allowances paid pursuant to 24 section 904.701 directly to a dependent of the inmate, or may 25 deposit the allowance wage to the account of the inmate, or 26 may deposit a portion and allow the inmate a portion for the 27 inmateâs personal use. 28 Sec. 4. Section 914.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 914.2 Right of application. 31 Except as otherwise provided in section 902.2 or 914.8 , a 32 person convicted of a criminal offense has the right to make 33 application to the board of parole for recommendation or to 34 the governor for a reprieve, pardon, commutation of sentence, 35 -3- LSB 1561YH (2) 91 as/js 3/ 6 H.F. 732 remission of fines or forfeitures, or restoration of rights of 1 citizenship at any time following the conviction. 2 Sec. 5. Section 914.6, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 3. In the case of a remission of fines and forfeitures, 5 restoration of rights of citizenship other than the right to 6 register to vote and to vote , or a pardon, commutation of 7 sentence, or reprieve, if the person is not in custody, one 8 copy of the executive instrument shall be delivered to the 9 person and one copy to the clerk of the district court where 10 the judgment is of record. A list of the restorations of 11 rights of citizenship issued by the governor shall be delivered 12 to the state registrar of voters at least once each month. 13 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 914.8 Restoration of right to register 14 and to vote. 15 1. A person convicted of a felony criminal offense who has 16 been discharged from probation under section 907.9, discharged 17 from parole or work release under section 906.15, or released 18 from confinement under section 902.6 because the person has 19 completed the personâs term of confinement shall have the right 20 to register to vote and to vote restored as provided in this 21 section. 22 2. Upon discharge from confinement or supervision, the 23 department of corrections or judicial district department of 24 correctional services, whichever is applicable, shall provide 25 written notice to the inmate, parolee, or probationer of the 26 personâs discharge, which shall include a voter registration 27 form and a statement that the personâs right to register to 28 vote and to vote is restored. The notice shall also inform the 29 person that when first registering to vote after discharge, the 30 person must present the discharge notice to the commissioner of 31 registration. 32